Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.48.090

Malicious mischief in the third degree.

(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the third degree if he or she:

(a) Knowingly and maliciously causes physical damage to the property of another, under circumstances not amounting to malicious mischief in the first or second degree; or

(b) Writes, paints, or draws any inscription, figure, or mark of any type on any public or private building or other structure or any real or personal property owned by any other person unless the person has obtained the express permission of the owner or operator of the property, under circumstances not amounting to malicious mischief in the first or second degree.

(2) Malicious mischief in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2009 c 431 s 6; 2003 c 53 s 71; 1996 c 35 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.48.090.]

NOTES:

Applicability—2009 c 431: See note following RCW 4.24.230.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Property crime database, liability: RCW 4.24.340.